Tennessee, session 114, HB2497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-116(a), is amended by deleting
the language "public works, land use and land use planning" and substituting "public works,
healthcare facilities, land use, and land use planning".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2497
012526
- 1 -